California statutes. Education Code
(a) The school district of choice shall not prohibit a transfer of a pupil pursuant to this article based upon a determination by the governing board of that school district that the additional cost of educating the pupil would exceed the amount of additional state aid received as a result of the transfer. A school district of choice may reject the transfer of a pupil if the transfer of that pupil would require that school district to create a new program to serve that pupil, except that a school district of choice shall not reject the transfer of a special needs pupil, including an individual with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026, an English learner, a foster youth, or a homeless child or youth.

(b) This section is intended to ensure that pupils in
 special education, or who are bilingual, English learners, foster youth, or homeless children or youth, are not discriminated against by the school district of choice because of the costs associated with educating those pupils. Pupils with special needs may take full advantage of the choice options available under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 865, Sec. 3.   (SB 897)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48304.

An application of any pupil for transfer may not be approved under this article if the transfer would require the displacement, from a school or program conducted within any attendance area of the school district of choice, of any other pupil who resides within that attendance area or is currently enrolled in that school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 21, Sec. 1.   Effective March 5, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

48305.

School districts of choice may employ existing entrance criteria for specialized schools or programs if the criteria are uniformly applied to all applicants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 21, Sec. 1.   Effective March 5, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

48306.

(a) A school district of choice shall give first priority for attendance to siblings of children already in attendance in that school district.

(b) A school district of choice shall give second priority for attendance to pupils eligible for free or reduced-price meals, and pupils who are foster youth or homeless children or youth.

(c) A school district of choice shall give third priority for attendance to children of military personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 55.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

48307.

(a) A school district of residence with an average daily attendance greater than 50,000 may limit the number of pupils transferring to a school district of choice pursuant to this article each year to 1 percent of its average daily attendance, as reported as of the first principal apportionment for the prior fiscal year.

(b) (1) A school district of residence with an average daily attendance of 50,000 or less may limit the number of pupils transferring to a school district of choice pursuant to this article each year to 3 percent of its average daily attendance, as reported as of the first principal apportionment for the prior fiscal year, and may limit the maximum number of pupils transferring out for the duration of the program authorized by
 this article to 10 percent of the average daily attendance for that period.

(2) (A) Upon the request of a school district of residence, the county office of education shall determine the percentage of pupils transferring out of the school district of residence for the duration of the program pursuant to paragraph (1).

 (B) The county office of education shall request data from the school district of choice regarding the number of pupils transferring into the school district of choice.

(C) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 48301, if the school district of choice does not provide the number of pupils transferring into the school district of choice to the county office of education within 30 days, the school district of choice is prohibited from accepting new pupil transfers pursuant to
 this article until the school district of choice complies with the county office of education data request.

 (D) Within 60 days of receiving the determination from the county office of education that the 10-percent cap has been reached, a school district of residence shall issue a letter to the county office of education and the school district of choice notifying them that the 10-percent cap has been reached and that further pupil transfers are prohibited.

(c) (1) If, pursuant to the audit described in Section 48301, a school district of choice is identified as having accepted pupils from a school district of residence pursuant to this article after a school district of residence has provided a notice pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of this section or subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 48308 that
 it has reached a limit specified in subdivision (a) or (b), as applicable, of this section, all of the following shall occur:

(A) The auditor shall determine the average daily attendance generated by each pupil in excess of the applicable cap whose transfer originated from the school district of residence subsequent to the notice, disaggregated by local control funding formula grade span.

(B) The auditor shall calculate the portion of the school district of choice’s local control funding formula apportionment attributable to the average daily attendance determined pursuant to subparagraph (A) and report that amount to the Superintendent.

(C) Notwithstanding any other law, the Superintendent shall reduce the school district of choice’s local control funding formula apportionment each year by the amount calculated and
 reported by the auditor.

(2) Pupils admitted to a school district of choice pursuant to this article before any audit findings pursuant to paragraph (1) may continue to attend that school district pursuant to this article.

(d) A school district of residence that has a qualified or negative status on the most recent budget certification completed by the county superintendent of schools in any fiscal year may limit the number of pupils who transfer out of the district in that fiscal year.

(e) Notwithstanding any prior or existing certification of a school district of residence pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 42130) of Chapter 6 of Part 24, if a county superintendent of schools determines that a school district of residence would not meet the standards and criteria for fiscal stability specified in
 Section 42131 for the subsequent fiscal year exclusively due to the impact of additional pupil transfers pursuant to this article in that year, the school district of residence may limit the number of additional pupils who transfer in the upcoming school year pursuant to this article up to the number that the county superintendent of schools identifies beyond which number of additional transfers would result in a qualified or negative certification in that year exclusively as a result of additional transfers pursuant to this article.

(f) A school district of residence, upon receiving notification of a pupil’s acceptance into the school district of choice, may prohibit the transfer of a pupil pursuant to this article or limit the number of pupils so transferred if the governing board of the school district of residence determines that the transfer would negatively impact any of the following:

(1) The court-ordered desegregation plan of the school district of residence.

(2) The voluntary desegregation plan of the school district of residence, consistent with the provisions of Proposition 209, an initiative measure adopted by the voters at the November 5, 1996, statewide general election.

(3) The racial and ethnic balance of the school district of residence, consistent with the provisions of Proposition 209, an initiative measure adopted by the voters at the November 5, 1996, statewide general election.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a school district of residence shall not prohibit the transfer of a pupil who is a child of an active military duty parent.

(h) A school district of residence shall not adopt
 policies that in any way block or discourage pupils from applying for transfer to a school district of choice.

(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a pupil attending a school district of choice, or a pupil who received a notice of acceptance into a school district of choice before the school district of residence restricted further transfers pursuant to subdivision (d) or (e), shall be permitted to attend the school district of choice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 865, Sec. 5.   (SB 897)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48308.

(a) (1) An application requesting a transfer pursuant to this article shall be submitted by the parent of a pupil to the school district of choice before January 1 of the school year preceding the school year for which the pupil is requesting to be transferred. This application deadline may be waived upon agreement of the school district of residence of the pupil and the school district of choice.

(2) The application deadline specified in paragraph (1) does not apply to an application requesting a transfer if the parent of the pupil with whom the pupil resides is enlisted in the military and was relocated by the military less than 90 days before submitting the application.

(b) The
 application may be submitted on a form provided for this purpose by the department, and may request enrollment of the pupil in a specific school or program of the school district of choice.

(c) (1) By no later than January 15, the school district of choice shall notify the school district of residence of the number and names of pupils from the school district of residence who are requesting to be transferred for the following school year, by school and grade level.

(2) (A) By no later than February 15, the school district of residence shall notify the school district of choice of the total number and names of pupils requesting to be transferred to school districts of choice in excess of the limits specified in subdivision (a) or (b), as applicable, of Section 48307, if applicable.

(B) The notification shall include the maximum pupil yields pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), as applicable, of Section 48307, the name of each school district of choice that pupils are requesting to be transferred, and the number of pupil transfer requests for each school district of choice.

(3) By no later than March 1 of the school year preceding the school year for which the pupil is requesting to be transferred, the governing board of the school district of choice shall notify the parent in writing whether the application has been provisionally accepted or rejected, or of the placement of the pupil on a waiting list. The governing board of the school district of choice may fill vacancies from the waiting list until May 1 preceding the school year for which the pupil is requesting to be transferred. No pupils shall be accepted at a school district of choice after May 1 preceding
 the school year for which the pupil is requesting to be transferred.

(4) On or before May 1, the school district of choice shall provide the school district of residence with the final number of pupils to be enrolled in the school district of choice, disaggregated by school, grade level, and pupil name.

(5) If the application is rejected, the governing board of the school district of choice shall include in the written notification to the parent that the number of pupils applying to transfer exceeded the capacity of the school district of choice or the specific school or program to which the pupil applied and that the pupil was not selected during the random drawing. The determination shall be accurately recorded in the minutes of the governing board meeting in which the determination was made.

(6) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), the governing board of a school district of choice shall, not later than 90 days after receipt of an application submitted according to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), make a final acceptance or rejection of that application. A pupil may enroll in a school in the school district of choice immediately upon the pupil’s acceptance.

(B) If an application submitted according to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is submitted less than 90 days before the beginning of the school year for which the pupil seeks to be transferred, the governing board of the school district of choice shall accept or deny the application before the commencement of the school year. A pupil may enroll in a school in the school district of choice immediately upon the pupil’s acceptance.

(d) Final acceptance of the transfer is applicable for one school year and will
 be renewed automatically each year unless the school district of choice, through the adoption of a resolution, elects to no longer accept any transfer pupils pursuant to this article. However, if a school district of choice elects to no longer accept pupils under this article, high school pupils admitted under this article may continue to attend the same school in the school district of choice until they graduate from high school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 865, Sec. 6.   (SB 897)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48309.

(a) Any school district of choice that admits any pupil under this section may accept any completed coursework, attendance, and other academic progress credited to that pupil by the school district or districts previously attended by that pupil, and may grant academic standing to that pupil based upon the district’s evaluation of the academic progress credited to that pupil.

(b) Any school district of choice that admits a pupil under this section may revoke the pupil’s transfer if the pupil is recommended for expulsion pursuant to Section 48918.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 21, Sec. 1.   Effective March 5, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

48310.

(a) The average daily attendance for pupils admitted by a school district of choice pursuant to this article shall be credited to that school district pursuant to Section 46607. The attendance report for the school district of choice may include an identification of the school district of residence.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, state aid for categorical education programs for pupils admitted under this article shall be apportioned to the school district of choice.

(c) (1) For a school district of choice that is a basic aid school district, the apportionment of state funds for average daily attendance credited pursuant to this section shall be 25 percent of the school
 district local control funding formula base grant computed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, that would have been apportioned to the school district of residence.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the term “basic aid school district” means a school district that does not receive from the state, for a fiscal year in which this subdivision is applied, an apportionment of state funds as described in subdivision (o) of Section 42238.02.

(d) The average daily attendance of pupils admitted by a school district of choice pursuant to this article shall be credited to that school district for purposes of any determination under Article 2 (commencing with Section 17010) of Chapter 12 of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1 that uses an average daily attendance calculation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 50.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

48311.

Upon request of the pupil’s parent, each school district of choice that admits a pupil under this article to any school or program of the school district may provide to the pupil transportation assistance to that school or program, to the extent that the school district otherwise provides transportation assistance to pupils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 15, Sec. 38.   (AB 99)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

48312.

(a) Each school district may make information regarding its schools, programs, policies, and procedures available to any interested person upon request.

(b) A school district of choice shall make public announcements regarding its schools, programs, policies, and procedures, including transportation options pursuant to Section 48311, if applicable, during the enrollment period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 15, Sec. 39.   (AB 99)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

48313.

(a) (1) Pursuant to this article, each school district of choice shall keep an accounting of all requests made for transfers pursuant to this article and records of all disposition of those requests that shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The number of requests granted, denied, or withdrawn. In the case of denied requests, the records shall indicate the reasons for the denials.

(B) The number of pupils transferred out of the school district of choice pursuant to this article.

(C) The number of pupils transferred into the school district of choice pursuant to this article.

(D) The race, ethnicity, gender, self-reported socioeconomic status, eligibility for free or reduced-price meals, foster youth status, homeless child or youth status, and the school district of residence of each of the pupils described in subparagraphs (B) and (C).

(E) The number of pupils described in subparagraphs (B) and (C) who are classified as English learners or identified as individuals with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026.

(2) If the school district of choice provides transportation to pupils pursuant to Section 48311, the school district of choice shall keep an accounting of the number of pupils as described in subparagraphs (D) and (E) of paragraph (1) transported pursuant to Section 48311 and the total number of pupils transported under this article.

(b) The information maintained pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be reported to the governing board of the school district of choice at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing board of the school district of choice. By no later than October 15 of each year, the school district of choice shall report the information maintained pursuant to subdivision (a) for the current school year in addition to information regarding the school district’s status as a school district of choice for the upcoming school year to each school district that is geographically adjacent to the school district of choice, to the county office of education in which the school district of choice is located, and, in a manner specified by the Superintendent, to the Superintendent.

(c) A school district of choice shall not enroll a pupil under this article if the school district does not report all the data
 required pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) The Superintendent shall do all of the following:

(1) Maintain a list of the school districts of choice in the state.

(2) Collect the information specified in subdivision (a) from each school district of choice. The Superintendent shall ensure school districts of choice provide this information in a complete format and shall not create a new field in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System for this purpose. The Superintendent may provide a template for school districts of choice to use and may issue guidance regarding the procedures for collecting and reporting data.

(3) Post the information collected under paragraphs (1) and (2) on the department’s internet website. The Superintendent shall
 make this information available upon request to any school district.

(4) Post a single list of all school choice programs, including, but not limited to, school districts of choice, on the department’s internet website.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Superintendent collect data in a manner that minimizes the administrative burden on school districts and the state.

(f) The Superintendent annually shall make all of the following information available to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature, the Department of Finance, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office:

(1) The number and characteristics of pupils who use the school district of choice option pursuant to this article.

(2) Assessment scores of school districts of choice and school districts of residence pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 60640.

(3) The graduation rates of school districts of residence and school districts of choice.

(4) The enrollment of school districts of residence and school districts of choice for the previous five years.

(5) The fiscal health of school districts of residence and school districts of choice, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(A) Increasing or declining enrollment.

(B) Whether a school district received a negative or qualified rating pursuant to Section 42131.

(6) Whether a school district of residence has exceeded the transfer limits specified in Section 48307.

(7) The number of pupils described in subparagraphs (D) and (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) transported pursuant to this article pursuant to Section 48311.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 865, Sec. 7.   (SB 897)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48314.

It is the intent of the Legislature that every parent in this state be informed of his or her opportunity for currently existing school district of choice options under this article regardless of ethnicity, primary language, literacy, or special needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 15, Sec. 41.   (AB 99)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

48317.

Commencing with the 2018–19 school year, and each year thereafter, the department shall investigate complaints regarding a school district operating as a school district of choice without registering pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 48301 and a school district of choice failing to report data required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 48313. If the Superintendent finds that a school district is accepting pupils through a school district of choice program and the school district is not registered or the school district fails to report the required data, the Superintendent shall withhold from the school district’s apportionment pursuant to Section 42238.02 or 42238.03 an amount attributable to the average daily attendance of pupils enrolled through the school district of choice in the previous year. The Superintendent
 shall withhold this amount of the school district’s apportionment until the school district registers or reports the required data.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 15, Sec. 44.   (AB 99)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. School Attendance Review Boards [48320. - 48326.]

48320.

(a) In enacting this article it is the intent of the Legislature that intensive guidance and coordinated community services may be provided to meet the special needs of pupils with school attendance problems or school behavior problems.

(b) Any school attendance review board, established pursuant to this article, which determines that available public and private services are insufficient or inappropriate to correct school attendance or school behavior problems of minors may:

(1) Propose and promote the use of alternatives to the juvenile court system. 

(2) Provide, in any proposed alternative, for maximum utilization of community and regional resources appropriately employed in behalf of minors prior to any involvement with the judicial system.

(3) Encourage an understanding that any alternative based on the utilization of community resources carries an inherent agency and citizen commitment directed toward the continuing improvement of such resources and the creation of resources where none exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 327, Sec. 9.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

48321.

(a) (1) A county school attendance review board may be established in each county. The county school attendance review board may accept referrals or requests for hearing services from one or more school districts within its jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (f). A county school attendance review board may be operated through a consortium or partnership of a county with one or more school districts or between two or more counties.

(2) A county school attendance review board, if established, shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) A parent.

(B) A representative of school districts.

(C) A representative of the county probation department.

(D) A representative of the county welfare department.

(E) A representative of the county superintendent of schools.

(F) A representative of law enforcement agencies.

(G) A representative of community-based youth service centers.

(H) A representative of school guidance personnel.

(I) A representative of child welfare and attendance personnel.

(J) A representative of school or county health care personnel.

(K) A representative of school, county, or community mental health personnel.

(L) A representative of the county district attorney’s office. If more than one county is represented in a county school attendance review board, a representative from each county’s district attorney’s office may be included.

(M) A representative of the county public defender’s office. If more than one county is represented in a county school attendance review board, a representative from each county’s public defender’s office may be included.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), for purposes of conducting hearings, the chairperson of the county school attendance review board is authorized to determine the members needed at a hearing, based on the needs of the pupil, in order to address attendance or behavioral problems.

(4) The school district representatives on the county school attendance review board shall be nominated by the governing boards of school districts and shall be appointed by the county superintendent of schools. All other persons and group representatives shall be appointed by the county board of education.

(5) (A) If a county school attendance review board exists, the county superintendent of schools shall, at the beginning of
 each school year, convene a meeting of the county school attendance review board for purposes of adopting plans to promote interagency and community cooperation and to reduce the duplication of services provided to youth who have serious school attendance and behavior problems.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for purposes of conducting hearings, a county school attendance review board may meet as needed.

(b) (1) Local school attendance review boards may include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) A parent.

(B) A representative of school districts.

(C) A representative of the county probation department.

(D) A representative of the county welfare department.

(E) A representative of the county superintendent of schools.

(F) A representative of law enforcement agencies.

(G) A representative of community-based youth service centers.

(H) A representative of school guidance personnel.

(I) A representative of child welfare and attendance personnel.

(J) A representative of school or county health care personnel.

(K) A representative of school, county, or community mental health personnel.

(L) A representative of the county district attorney’s office. If more than one county is represented in a local school attendance review board, a representative from each county’s district attorney’s office may be included.

(M) A representative of the county public defender’s office. If more than one county is represented in a county school attendance review board, a representative from each county’s public defender’s office may be included.

(2) Other persons or group representatives shall be appointed by the county board of education.

(c) A county school attendance review board may elect, pursuant to regulations adopted pursuant to Section 48324, one member as chairperson with responsibility for coordinating services of the county school attendance review board.

(d) A county school attendance review board may provide for
 the establishment of local school attendance review boards in any number as shall be necessary to carry out the intent of this article.

(e) In any county in which there is no county school attendance review board the governing board of a school district may elect to establish a local school attendance review board, which shall operate in the same manner and have the same authority as a county school attendance review board.

(f) A county school attendance review board may provide guidance to local school attendance review boards.

(g) Each county school attendance review board and each local school attendance review board shall, at least annually, consult
 with pupils who reflect the diversity of all the schools that are served by the board for the purpose of soliciting input that will assist board members in gaining a better understanding of, and proposing interventions for, pupil attendance challenges and behavioral challenges.

(h) If the county school attendance review board determines that the needs of pupils, as defined in this article, can best be served by a single board, the county school attendance review board may then serve as the school attendance review board for all pupils in the county, or, upon the request of any school district in the
 county, the county school attendance review board may serve as the school attendance review board for pupils of that school district.

(i) This article is not intended to prohibit an agreement on the part of counties to provide these services on a regional basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   (AB 1939)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48321.5.

(a) In every case in which a minor pupil has been referred to it under Section 48263, each county or local school attendance review board may, for the purpose of making a proper disposition of the referral, issue subpoenas pursuant to the procedures provided in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1985) of Title 3 of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure and subject to subdivision (f), or may request the juvenile court having jurisdiction to issue subpoenas, requiring the production of pertinent or material written information or the attendance of any of the following persons:

(1) The minor.

(2) The minor’s parents, guardians, or other person having control of the minor.

(3) The school authority referring the minor.

(4) Any other person who has pertinent or material information concerning the matter.

(b) The juvenile court may issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses or the production of pertinent or material written information, subject to Section 1985 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) Enforcement of a subpoena issued by a county or local school attendance review board is within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court. The juvenile court does not have jurisdiction to order detention in any secure facility or other confinement for failure to comply with a subpoena issued pursuant to this section.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a county or local school attendance review board to issue a subpoena for the production of written materials or the attendance of any person except as specifically provided in subdivision (a) with respect to the limited purpose of making a proper disposition of the referral of a minor pupil made pursuant to Section 48263.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a county or local school attendance review board to issue a subpoena or request a subpoena to be issued for the production of written materials or the attendance of any person if it is verified that the minor pupil is enrolled and in regular attendance in a private school maintaining kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that has filed an affidavit pursuant to Sections 33190 and 48222 of the Education Code.

(f) A county or local school attendance review board shall not issue a subpoena that includes a request for production of written materials, but may request a juvenile court having jurisdiction to issue a subpoena for production of written materials pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 506, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

48322.

The county school attendance review board may encourage local school attendance review boards to maintain a continuing inventory of community resources, including alternative educational programs, and to make recommendations for the improvement of such resources and programs or for the creation of new resources and programs where none exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 327, Sec. 11.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

48323.

Each of the departments or agencies authorized to participate in school attendance review boards may assign personnel to represent the department or agency on a continuing basis in accordance with the intent of this article. The duties, obligations, or responsibilities which may be imposed on local governmental entities by this act are such that the related costs are incurred as a part of their normal operating procedures. The minor costs of such services may be borne by each agency or department and each or all of the participants may apply for and utilize state or federal funds as may be available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 327, Sec. 12.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

48324.

The county school attendance review board may adopt such rules and regulations not inconsistent with law, as are necessary for its own government and to enable it to carry out the provisions of this article. The rules and regulations may be binding upon the local school attendance review boards which are established pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48321.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 327, Sec. 13.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

48325.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that statewide policy coordination and personnel training with respect to county attendance review boards will greatly facilitate the achievement of the goals expressed in Section 48320. It is therefore the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to do the following:

(1) Encourage the cooperation, coordination, and development of strategies to support county school attendance review boards in carrying out their responsibilities to establish local school attendance review boards as necessary. These strategies may include, but need not be limited to, plans for the training of school attendance review board personnel.

(2) Divert pupils with serious attendance and behavioral problems from the juvenile justice system to agencies more directly related to the state public school system by developing a system for gathering and dispensing information on successful community-based and school-based programs.

(3) Reduce duplication of the services of state and county agencies in serving high-risk youth, including youth with school attendance or behavioral problems.

(4) Reduce the number of dropouts in the state public education system by promoting interagency cooperation among those agencies which have as their goals preventing students from dropping out, and increasing the holding power of the public schools.

(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall coordinate and administer a state school attendance review board, as follows:

(1) On or before January 31 of each year, the superintendent shall extend invitations of participation to representatives of appropriate groups throughout the state, including, but not limited to, representatives of school districts, parent groups, county probation departments, county welfare departments, county superintendents of schools, law enforcement agencies, community-based youth service centers, school guidance personnel, child welfare and attendance personnel, the health care profession and state associations having an interest in youth with school attendance or behavioral problems. The superintendent shall also request the participation of representatives from interested state agencies or departments, including, but not limited to, the Department of the California Youth Authority, the Department of Justice, the State Department of Social Services, and the Office of Criminal Justice Planning. To the extent feasible, members of the board shall include persons who are currently members of county or local school attendance review boards. For every year after the first year that the board is convened, the purpose of the invitations of participation shall be to inform appropriate groups, state agencies, and departments of the purposes of the board, to fill vacancies, and to supplement the membership of the board as necessary.

(2) The superintendent shall prescribe an appropriate deadline for acceptance of invitations of participation as a member of the state school attendance review board for that particular year, and the invitations accepted on or before the deadline shall constitute the board for that year, except that the board shall also include a representative of the State Department of Education designated by the director of that department. The representative of the State Department of Education shall be the chairperson of the board.

(3) The superintendent shall convene the board at least four times during the year. At its first meeting, the board shall elect any officers, other than its chairperson, as it deems necessary. Members of the board shall serve without compensation and without reimbursement of travel and living expenses.

(4) The State Department of Education shall provide assistance as requested by the Superintendent of Public Instruction in order to implement the provisions of this section.

(c) The state school attendance review board shall make recommendations annually to the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and to state agencies as deemed appropriate, regarding the needs and services provided to high-risk youth, including youth with school attendance or behavioral problems, in the state public schools, and shall propose uniform guidelines or other means to attain the goals stated in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 222, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

48326.

The department shall, by the beginning of the 2026–27 school year, post information on its internet website about the methods of reducing chronic absenteeism listed in subdivisions (a) to (g), inclusive.

(a) Identifying barriers to attendance for chronically absent pupils through screenings and interpersonal data collection.

(b) Developing and implementing absence intervention plans that may include supportive services for pupils and families.

(c) Home visits to chronically absent pupils.

(d) Counseling and
 wellness check-ins.

(e) Workshop trainings for families of chronically absent pupils.

(f) Partnering with public and nonprofit agencies to provide assistance to families and pupils to reduce absences.
